Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB743.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204.1(k) introductory paragraph of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended, the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 204.1. State Unemployment Compensation Advisory Council.--* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (k) The department shall also prepare and present to the Governor and the General Assembly, on or before the first day of March of each year, an evaluation of the financial operations of the unemployment compensation program, together with its findings and recommendations for developing and improving solvency of the fund and adjusting and regulating income and disbursements in the fields of contributions and benefits. [Such] The report shall include the presentation of the current economic trends, statistics and analyses on which the evaluation is based. The department shall post a copy of the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. This evaluation shall include all of the following:* * *(1.1) The following information:(i) Total number of individuals unemployed fifteen (15) weeks or longer, as a percent of the civilian labor force.(ii) Total number of job losers and individuals who completed temporary employment, as a percent of the civilian labor force.(iii) Total number of individuals unemployed, as a percent of the civilian labor force.(iv) Total number of individuals unemployed plus discouraged workers, as a percent of the civilian labor force plus discouraged workers.(v) Total number of individuals unemployed, plus discouraged workers, plus all other marginally attached workers, as a percent of the civilian labor force plus all marginally attached workers.(vi) Total number of individuals unemployed, plus all marginally attached workers, plus total number of individuals 20250SB0743PN0793 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employed part time for economic reasons, as a percent of the civilian labor force plus all marginally attached workers.* * *(l) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Civilian labor force" means all individuals sixteen (16) years of age or older who are classified as either employed or unemployed."Discouraged worker" means an individual who is:(1) not in the labor force;(2) wants, and is available for, employment; and(3) has looked for employment some time in the prior twelve (12) months but has not recently looked for employment for reasons related to the job market."Employed" means an individual who did any work at all for pay or profit or worked fifteen (15) hours or more without pay in a family business or on a farm, including an individual who is not working but has employment from which the individual was temporarily absent, whether or not paid, due to a labor-management dispute, illness or vacation."Employed part time for economic reasons" means an individual who wants, and is available for, full-time employment but is employed on a part-time schedule."Job loser" means an individual who lost employment due to layoff or other dismissal."Marginally attached worker" means an individual who is currently neither employed nor looking for employment but indicates a desire for employment, is able to work and has looked for employment in the past twelve (12) months."Unemployed" means an individual who is not employed but has 20250SB0743PN0793 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 looked for employment in the last four (4) weeks and is available to work.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0743PN0793 - 4 - 123